Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1309
Presumption with respect to noise.

A person who
is shooting in compliance with the shooting range performance standards at
a shooting range between the hours of 7:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. is presumed
not to be engaging in unlawful conduct merely because of the noise caused
by the shooting.

Laws 2009, LB503, § 9.